Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.660.080

Application—Conditional scholarship and loan repayment agreements.

Nothing in RCW 28B.102.020, 28B.102.030, 28B.102.045, 28B.102.055, 28B.102.080 through 28B.102.160, 43.79A.040, or sections 210 and 226, chapter 295, Laws of 2019 modifies or otherwise affects conditional scholarship or loan repayment agreements under this chapter or chapter 28B.102 RCW existing before May 8, 2019.

[ 2019 c 295 s 228.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.